Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.050

Warehouse license fees—Penalty.

Any application for a license to operate a warehouse shall be accompanied by a license fee of one thousand nine hundred dollars for a terminal warehouse, one thousand five hundred dollars for a subterminal warehouse, and seven hundred dollars for a country warehouse. If a licensee operates more than one warehouse under one state license as provided for in RCW 22.09.030, the license fee shall be computed by multiplying the number of physically separated warehouses within the station by the applicable terminal, subterminal, or country warehouse license fee.

If an application for renewal of a warehouse license or licenses is not received by the department prior to the renewal date or dates established by the director by rule, a penalty of fifty dollars for the first week and one hundred dollars for each week thereafter shall be assessed and added to the original fee and shall be paid by the applicant before the renewal license may be issued. This penalty does not apply if the applicant furnishes an affidavit certifying that he or she has not acted as a warehouse operator subsequent to the expiration of his or her prior license.

[ 2012 c 123 s 1; 2011 c 336 s 602; 1997 c 303 s 6; 1994 c 46 s 4; 1991 c 109 s 25; 1986 c 203 s 13; 1983 c 305 s 22; 1979 ex.s. c 238 s 14; 1963 c 124 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1997 c 303 ss 6 and 7: "Sections 6 and 7 of this act take effect July 1, 1998." [ 1997 c 303 s 8.]

Findings—1997 c 303: See note following RCW 43.135.055.

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.